Nebraska, session 109, LB87.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB87 LB87
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-8616, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-8616 (1) The commission shall develop a statewide support service
provider program for deaf-blind persons that facilitates a transition
from dependency to independent living and participation in society. All
property, equipment, supplies, and personnel which belonged to, were
allocated to, or were used to support the Division of Rehabilitation
Services for the Visually Impaired within the Department of Health and
Human Services prior to July 1, 2000, are transferred to the Commission
for the Blind and Visually Impaired.
(2) The program shall include, but not be limited to, (a) assistance
to live independently, (b) access to visual, situational, and
environmental information, (c) services of a human guide, (d)
facilitation of brief, casual exchanges of spoken or signed
conversations, and (e) assistance with daily living activities such as
transportation to and from appointments, reading and sorting mail, and
recipes and food labeling.
(3) The commission may contract with a private provider or may offer
the services directly through the program.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred
thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 and one
hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27 to
the commission for the statewide support service provider program.
(2) All existing contracts and agreements in effect on July 1, 2000,
as to the Division of Rehabilitation Services for the Visually Impaired
within the Department of Health and Human Services are binding and
effective upon the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-8616, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-